Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-134
Deposits; repayment only on presentation of pass book, when; notice.

Banks may, by agreement, provide that deposits received under agreement shall be repaid only on presentation of pass books and may require notice to be given before such deposits are repaid.

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 34, p. 148.